apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AĄBCĆDEĘFGHIJKLŁMNŃOÓPQRSŚTUVWYZŹŻaąbcćdeęfghijklłmnńoópqrsśtuvwxyzźż</alphabet>
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-en-pl.symbols.xml"/>

  <pardefs>
   <!-- punctuation etc. -->
   <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
         <re>[’'‘]</re>
         <p>
           <l/>
           <r><s n="apos"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lquote">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>„</l>
          <r><s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>«</l>
          <r><s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>,,</l>
          <r><s n="lquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rquote">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>”</l>
          <r><s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>»</l>
          <r><s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>''</l>
          <r><s n="rquot"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
       <e>
         <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
         <p>
           <l/>
           <r><s n="sent"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
    </pardef>
     <!-- Umm... neither Polish nor English use this, so is it necessary? -->
    <pardef n="separ">
       <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Number regexes -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  
    <!-- Tag pardefs -->
    <pardef n="i__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="halo__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bardzo__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="do__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="doń__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><b/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><b/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w_we__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eń</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><b/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eń</l>
          <r><s n="pr"/><b/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="kolwiek__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kolwiek</l>
          <r>kolwiek<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>bądź</l>
          <r>kolwiek<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ani"><i>ani</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oraz"><i>oraz</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ale"><i>ale</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lecz"><i>lecz</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="albo"><i>albo</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="lub"><i>lub</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="albo i"><i>albo<b/>i</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="albo nawet"><i>albo<b/>nawet</i><par n="i__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="halo"><i>halo</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hej"><i>hej</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="a no"><i>a<b/>no</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aj"><i>aj</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ojej"><i>ojej</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ojejku"><p><l>ojejku</l><r>ojej</r></p><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jej"><p><l>jej</l><r>ojej</r></p><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jejku"><p><l>jejku</l><r>ojej</r></p><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="no i ten"><i>no<b/>i<b/>ten</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="O Boże"><i>O<b/>Boże</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Jezu"><i>Jezu</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="au"><i>au</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="kurwa"><i>kurwa</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="och"><i>och</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Matko"><i>Matko</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pfu"><i>pfu</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pfe"><i>pfe</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hę"><i>hę</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hi"><i>hi</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wcale nie"><i>wcale<b/>nie</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="miau"><i>miau</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hau"><i>hau</i><par n="halo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tak jak"><i>tak<b/>jak</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="bardzo"><i>bardzo</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="wcale nie"><i>wcale<b/>nie</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ledwo"><i>ledwo</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ledwie"><i>ledwie</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="mniej więcej"><i>mniej<b/>więcej</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="równie"><i>równie</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tak"><i>tak</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="trochę"><i>trochę</i><par n="bardzo__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>do</i><par n="doń__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="od"><i>od</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dla"><i>dla</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="doń__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="obok"><i>obok</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="koło"><i>koło</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wśród"><i>wśród</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bez"><i>bez</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="oprócz"><i>oprócz</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="z"><i>z</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ku"><i>ku</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dzięki"><i>dzięki</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wbrew"><i>wbrew</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przeciwko"><i>przeciwko</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przez"><i>przez</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="doń__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="doń__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="za"><i>za</i><par n="doń__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pod"><i>pod</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="w"><i>w</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przy"><i>przy</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przed"><i>przed</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="przez"><i>przez</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="między"><i>między</i><par n="do__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nad"><i>nad</i><par n="w_we__pr"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/> <!-- Separators -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/> <!-- Comma -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/> <!-- Apostrophe -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/> <!-- Left parenthensis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/> <!-- Right parenthesis -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/> <!-- Hyphen -->
    </e>
